Utah statutes.
53B-21-103.   Agreements with federal government for funds.

The board may enter into an agreement with the federal government in order to obtain funds for the following purposes: (1) to supplement bond proceeds used to pay for the projects referred to in Section 53B-21-101; and (2) to supplement income and revenues which, under this chapter, are used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this chapter.

